Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1112
Department of Administrative Services; budget administrator; qualifications; compensation.

The budget division shall be headed by an administrator subject to the supervision of the Director of Administrative Services. The director may appoint as budget administrator any person who has successfully completed a four-year program in an accredited college or university and who has not less than three years experience involving responsibility for the management or control or review of finances or of management, or both. Eight years of responsible experience in the management, review, or control of finances of governmental agencies or of private enterprises may be substituted for the educational and experience requirements set forth in this section. The compensation of the budget administrator shall be fixed by the director subject to the availability of appropriations. The budget and planning administrator shall have the duties, powers and responsibility to staff and maintain and shall oversee such bureau.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 12, p. 1698;

Laws 1967, c. 593, § 4, p. 2018;

Laws 1969, c. 804, § 6, p. 3035.